Utah statutes.
10-2-710.   Limitation on jurisdiction of court to consider disincorporation petition.

No district court has jurisdiction to consider a petition seeking disincorporation of a municipality or to order an election based upon the submission of such a petition if:

(1)  the disincorporation petition is filed with the court less than two years after the official date of incorporation of the municipality which the petition seeks to dissolve; or

(2)  the disincorporation petition is filed with the court less than two years after the date of an election held to decide the question of dissolution of the municipality which the petition seeks to dissolve.

